Washington statutes.
RCW 39.44.070

Life of bonds.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any charter to the contrary, bonds issued under *RCW 39.44.010 through 39.44.080 may be issued to run for a period up to forty years from the date of the issue and shall, as near as practicable, be issued for a period which shall not exceed the life of the improvement to be acquired by the use of the bonds.

[ 1967 c 107 s 5; 1923 c 151 s 5; RRS s 5583-5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 39.44.010, 39.44.011, 39.44.020, 39.44.030, 39.44.060, and 39.44.080 were repealed by 1984 c 186 s 70.